District of Columbia statutes.
38-754.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Community partner” means a provider of one or more eligible services.

(2)

“Community school” means a public and private partnership to coordinate educational, developmental, family, health, and after-school-care programs during school and non-school hours for students, families, and local communities at a public school or public charter school with the objectives of improving academic achievement, reducing absenteeism, building stronger relationships between students, parents, and communities, and improving the skills, capacity, and well-being of the surrounding community residents.

(3)

“Eligible consortium” means a partnership established between a local education agency and one or more community partners for purposes of establishing, operating, and sustaining a community school.

(4)

“Eligible services” means:

(A)

Primary medical and dental care that will be available to students and community residents;

(B)

Mental health prevention and treatment services that will be available to students and community residents;

(C)

Academic-enrichment activities designed to promote a student’s cognitive development and provide opportunities to practice and apply academic skills;

(D)

Programs designed to increase attendance, including reducing early chronic absenteeism rates;

(E)

Youth development programs designed to promote young people’s social, emotional, physical, and moral development, including arts, sports, physical fitness, youth leadership, community service, and service-learning opportunities;

(F)

Early childhood education, including Head Start and Early Head Start programs;

(G)

Programs designed to:

(i)

Facilitate parental involvement in, and engagement with, their children’s education, including parental activities that involve supporting, monitoring, and advocating for their children’s education;

(ii)

Promote parental leadership in the life of the school; and

(iii)

Build parenting skills;

(H)

School-age child-care services, including before-school and after-school services and full-day programming that operates during school holidays, summers, vacations, and weekends;

(I)

Programs that provide assistance to students who have been truant, suspended, or expelled and that offer multiple pathways to high school graduation or General Educational Development completion;

(J)

Youth and adult job-training services and career-counseling services;

(K)

Nutrition-education services;

(L)

Adult education, including instruction in English as a second language, adult literacy, computer literacy, financial literacy, and hard-skills training; or

(M)

Programs that provide remedial education and enrichment activities.

History

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 402, 59 DCR 3642

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-754.03.